North Carolina, session 2025, HB572.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) The Department of Military and Veterans Affairs shall select a
provider to establish a statewide pilot program to make eTMS available for veterans, first
responders, and immediate family members of veterans and first responders experiencing one or
more of the conditions listed in subsection (b) of this section. For purposes of this act, the
following definitions shall apply:
(1) Electroencephalogram combined Transcranial Magnetic Stimulation
Treatment (eTMS). – Treatment in which transcranial magnetic stimulation
frequency pulses are tuned to the patient's physiology and biometric data.
(2) Immediate family. – A spouse, child, stepchild, parent, or stepparent.
(3) Veteran. – A person who (i) served in the Armed Forces of the United States
on active duty, for reasons other than training, and has been discharged under
other than dishonorable conditions, (ii) served in a reserve component as
defined in 38 U.S.C. § 101(27), and (iii) served in the National Guard of any
state.
SECTION 1.(b) The conditions that shall be the subject of the pilot program are the
following:
(1) Substance use disorders.
(2) Mental illness.
(3) Sleep disorders.
(4) Traumatic brain injuries.
(5) Sexual trauma.
(6) Posttraumatic stress disorder and accompanying comorbidities.
(7) Concussions.
(8) Other brain trauma.
(9) Quality of life issues affecting human performance, including issues related
to or resulting from problems with cognition and problems maintaining
attention, concentration, or focus.
*H572-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 1.(c) The provider selected by the Department to conduct the pilot
program must display a history of serving veteran and first responder populations at a statewide
level. The provider shall establish a network for in-person and off-site care with the goal of
providing statewide access. Consideration shall be provided to locations with a large population
of first responders and veterans. In addition to traditional eTMS devices, the provider may utilize
nonmedical portable magnetic stimulation devices to improve access to underserved populations
in remote areas or to be used to serve as a pre-post treatment or a stand-alone device. The provider
shall be required to establish and operate a clinical practice and to evaluate outcomes of such
clinical practice.
SECTION 1.(d) At a minimum, the pilot program shall include all of the following:
(1) The establishment of a peer-to-peer support network by the provider made
available to all individuals receiving treatment under the program.
(2) The requirement that each individual who receives treatment under the
program also must receive neurophysiological monitoring, monitoring for
symptoms of substance use and other mental health disorders, and access to
counseling and wellness programming. Each individual who receives
treatment must also participate in the peer-to-peer support network established
by the provider.
(3) The establishment of protocols which include the use of adopted stimulation
frequency and intensity modulation based on EEGs done on days 0, 10, and
20 and motor threshold testing, as well as clinical symptoms, signs, and
biometrics.
(4) The requirement that protocols and outcomes of any treatment provided by
the clinical practice shall be collected and reported by the provider not later
than September 15, 2026, to the Department, the Joint Legislative Oversight
Committee on General Government, and the Fiscal Research Division. The
report shall include the bio-data metrics and all expenditures made using State
funds.
SECTION 1.(e) The Department may adopt rules to implement the provisions of this
act.
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law.
Page 2 House Bill 572-First Edition